Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-941
Total monthly
benefit, defined; how computed.

For purposes of
sections 79-941 to 79-946, unless the
context otherwise requires, total monthly benefit means the benefit that would
have been received under a monthly life annuity with no refund or death benefit
option even though a different option, as provided in section 79-938, has
been selected. The total monthly benefit shall be computed as if the person
had retired at age sixty-five or at the actual age of retirement, whichever
is later.

Laws 1980, LB 228, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1559;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 576;

Laws 2011, LB509, § 27.